Utah statutes.
61-2a-11.   Authority to take disciplinary action.
(1)  Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit the authority of the
director of the division to take disciplinary action against a licensee for a
violation of Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate, or of the rules of the
commission and division.
(2)  The repayment in full of all obligations to the fund by a licensee does
not nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary proceeding brought
pursuant to Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate, or the rules of the
commission.
